Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,136
Grievance review procedures; records.

Grievance review procedures shall provide that a record of grievances and any decision made with respect to such grievances shall be preserved for a period of one year.

Laws 1976, LB 275, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 83-4,116;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 61.